Tennessee, session 114, HB1452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-3-503, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(g)
(1) A child care agency that provides child care services through a child
development program and is accredited by the United States department of
defense, as described in 32 CFR 79, is not subject to licensure and does not
require an exemption from licensing to operate lawfully as long as such child care
agency provides child care services only to an eligible patron.
(2) As used in this subsection (g),"child development program" and
"eligible patron" have the same meaning as defined in 32 CFR 79.3.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1452
009929
- 1 -